Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.070

Rural county library districts or rural partial-county library districts—Disbursement of revenues and collection of taxes.

The county treasurer of the county in which any rural county library district or rural partial-county library district is created shall receive and disburse all district revenues and collect all taxes levied under this chapter.

[ 1993 c 284 s 3; 1984 c 186 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 6; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 2; 1955 c 59 s 7. Prior: 1947 c 75 s 11, part; 1943 c 251 s 1, part; 1941 c 65 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8226-4a, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.

Annual appropriations—Control of expenditures: RCW 27.12.240.

Capital outlays—General obligation bonds—Excess levies: RCW 27.12.222.